New York, session 2025-2026, A300.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 365-a of the social services law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 11 to read as follows: 3 11. Notwithstanding the provisions of section one hundred thirty-one-k 4 or any other provision of this article, medical assistance shall also 5 include payment for surgery, medical care and prescription drugs related 6 to organ transplantation for residents of New York who are otherwise 7 eligible for benefits pursuant to this title except for their immi- 8 gration status. A resident of New York shall only be deemed to be 9 eligible pursuant to this subdivision if the organ transplantation has 10 been deemed medically necessary, as proven by such means as shall be 11 designated in the regulations of the commissioner of health. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 13 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediate- 14 ly, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 15 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 16 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01184-01-5